Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 14-111, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 14-111. A. The governing body of a municipality may
provide for enforcement of its ordinances and establish fines,
penalties, or imprisonment, as authorized by subsections B through D
of this section, for any offense in violation of its ordinances,
which shall be recoverable together with costs of suit. The
governing body may provide that any person fined for violation of a
municipal ordinance who is financially able but refuses or neglects
to pay the fine or costs may be compelled to satisfy the amount owed
by working on the streets, alleys, avenues, areas, and public
grounds of the municipality, subject to the direction of the street
commissioner or other proper officer, at a rate per day as the

governing body may prescribe by ordinance, but not less than Fifty
Dollars ($50.00) per day for useful labor, until the fine or costs
are satisfied.
B. 1. Except for municipal ordinances related to prostitution
and as otherwise provided in this section subsection, cities having
a municipal criminal court of record may enact ordinances
prescribing maximum fines of One Thousand Two Hundred Dollars
($1,200.00) and costs or imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months
or both the such fine and imprisonment, but shall not have authority
to enact any ordinance making unlawful an act or omission declared
by state statute to be punishable as a felony.
2. Cities having a municipal criminal court of record may enact
ordinances prescribing maximum fines of One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00) and costs or imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months
or both such fine and imprisonment for violations of municipal
ordinances regulating the pretreatment of wastewater and regulating
stormwater discharges.
3. Cities having a municipal criminal court of record may enact
ordinances prescribing maximum fines of One Thousand Two Hundred
Fifty Dollars ($1,250.00) and costs or imprisonment not exceeding
six (6) months or both such fine and imprisonment for alcohol-
related or drug-related traffic offenses. The court shall remit
Fifty Dollars ($50.00) of each alcohol fine or deferral fee to a
fund of the municipality that shall be used to defray costs for
enforcement of laws relating to juvenile access to alcohol, other
laws relating to alcohol and other intoxicating substances, and
traffic-related offenses involving alcohol or other intoxicating
substances. The sum of Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) shall be assessed
in every case for violations of municipal ordinances relating to the
offense of driving under the influence of alcohol or other
intoxicating substance and shall be remitted to the credit of the
Oklahoma Impaired Driver Database Revolving Fund created pursuant to
Section 8 11-902d of this act Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
2. 4. For violations of municipal ordinances relating to
prostitution, including, but not limited to, engaging in
prostitution or soliciting or procuring prostitution, a municipal
criminal court of record may enact ordinances prescribing an
imprisonment not to exceed six (6) months, and fines as follows:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1775 Page 2

a. a fine not to exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($2,500.00) upon the first conviction for violation of
any such ordinances,
b. a fine of not more than to exceed Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00) upon the second conviction for
violation of any of such ordinances, and
c. a fine of not more than to exceed Seven Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) upon the third or
subsequent convictions for violation of any of such
ordinances, or both such fine and imprisonment as well
as a term of community service of not less than forty
(40) nor more than eighty (80) hours.
C. 1. Municipalities having a municipal court not of record
may enact ordinances prescribing maximum fines pursuant to the
provisions of this subsection. A municipal ordinance may not impose
a penalty, including fine or deferral fee in lieu of a fine and
costs, which that is greater than that established by statute for
the same offense.
2. The maximum fine or deferral fee in lieu of a fine for any
traffic-related offenses relating to speeding or parking, provided
that the penalty for such offense is not established by statute,
shall not exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00). For any traffic-
related offenses relating to speeding or parking with a penalty
established by statute, including fine or deferral fee in lieu of a
fine and costs, a municipal ordinance may impose a penalty that is
less than or equal to the penalty established by statute for the
same offense.
3. The maximum fine or deferral fee in lieu of a fine for
alcohol-related or drug-related offenses, provided that the penalty
for such offense is not established by statute, shall not exceed
Eight Hundred Dollars ($800.00). For all other offenses, the
maximum fine or deferral fee in lieu of a fine shall not exceed
Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars ($750.00) any alcohol-related or drug-
related offenses with a penalty established by statute, including
fine or deferral fee in lieu of a fine and costs, a municipal
ordinance may impose a penalty that is less than or equal to the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1775 Page 3

penalty established by statute for the same offense. The court
shall remit Fifty Dollars ($50.00) of each alcohol fine or deferral
fee to a fund of the municipality that shall be used to defray costs
for enforcement of laws relating to juvenile access to alcohol,
other laws relating to alcohol and other intoxicating substances,
and traffic-related offenses involving alcohol or other intoxicating
substances.
4. For all other offenses, provided that the penalty for such
offenses are not established by statute, the maximum fine or
deferral fee in lieu of a fine shall not exceed Seven Hundred Fifty
Dollars ($750.00).
5. The ordinances may prescribe costs pursuant to the
provisions of Section 27-126 of this title or imprisonment not
exceeding sixty (60) days or both the such fine and imprisonment;
provided, that municipalities. Municipalities having only a
municipal court not of record shall not have authority to enact any
ordinance making unlawful any act or omission declared by state
statute to be punishable as a felony; provided further, that
municipalities.
6. Municipalities having a municipal court not of record may
enact ordinances prescribing maximum fines of One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00) and costs or imprisonment not exceeding ninety (90) days
or both such fine and imprisonment for violations of municipal
ordinances regulating the pretreatment of wastewater and regulating
stormwater discharges. If imprisonment is available for the
offense, then that person charged shall have a right to a jury
trial.
D. Municipalities having both municipal criminal courts of
record and municipal courts not of record may enact ordinances,
within the authority of this section, for each court.
E. No municipality may levy a fine or deferral fee in lieu of a
fine of over Fifty Dollars ($50.00) until it has compiled and
published its penal ordinances as required in Sections 14-109 and
14-110 of this title.
F. No municipality may levy a fine of more than Ten Dollars
($10.00) nor court costs of more than Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) for
ENR. S. B. NO. 1775 Page 4

exceeding the posted speed limit by no more than ten (10) miles per
hour upon any portion of the National System of Interstate and
Defense Highways, federal-aid primary highways, and or the state
highway system which are is located on the outskirts of any
municipality as determined in Section 2-117 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
G. If any fine or deferral fee in lieu of a fine, as stated in
a municipal ordinance, or any other fine or fee schedule adopted by
a municipality, exceeds the maximum amount authorized by this
section or other applicable statutes for the same offense, the
amount is void and unenforceable to the extent of the excess amount
and shall be deemed reformed and reduced by operation of law to the
maximum lawful amount.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1775 Page 5

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1775 Page 6